finnish.large.aff
# suomi.aff   original version M. Vermeer   mv@fgi.fi
#             modified by Pauli Virtanen <pauli.virtanen@saunalahti.fi>
#             last updated 23. June 2000
#
# This Finnish affix file is mostly automatically generated by the genfisuffix
# Finnish ispell affix generator, which is written by me. However the leading
# part (up to the suffixes line) is written by Martin Vermeer.
#
# Why autogeneration? That is because in Finnish there are 5 possessive
# suffixes (and 1 additional), and 5 suffix particles. These can be combined
# up to and over 25 different ways (since also suffix particles can be
# combined together). Typing all of these by hand would of course be very
# hard, so I chose to make the computer do it for me. (That's what they are
# for, isn't it?)
#
# Compound words are for now turned on, and the affixes of back- and front-
# vowel words are separated in different flags.
#
# Help or helpful comments are appreciated. Also if you have found an error
# in this file, please let us know of it. Note that due to the autogeneration
# changes to the suffixes should be done to the source of genfisuffix program.
#
# If you want to know more details, reading the documentation of genfisuffix,
# may be helpful.
#
#
# Bibliography
#
# Finnish grammar. Fred Karlsson (1983), Werner Söderstrom Oy, Juva
#
# Suomen kielen perussanakirja. 
# Risto Haarala, päätoim. (1995). Kolmas painos. Painatuskeskus, Helsinki. 
# Ensimmäinen osa, sivut XIV-XIX.
#

nroffchars      ().\\*
texchars        ()\[]{}<\>\\$*.%

compoundwords on
allaffixes on

defstringtype "tex" "tex" ".mm" ".ms" ".me" ".man" ".NeXT" ".tex" ".lyx" ".bib"

boundarychars '
boundarychars \:
boundarychars \-
# How the heck do I make a soft hyphen (\-) into a boundary character? - MV

wordchars [a-z] [A-Z]
stringchar ä Ä
stringchar å Å
stringchar ö Ö

# Flags:
#
#            ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ
# Used       *****  ********** ********
# Available       --          -
#                 FG          R
#
# Summary:
#           
# prefixes  adjectives    cases      possessive    verbs        other
# -------- ------------ -----------  ----------  -----------  ---------
#  A ali-  H -mpi,mpaa                           U -a,akseni  L ko
#  B epä-  I -mpi,mpää  S ssa,llaan  P -ni,nsa   V -ä,äkseni  M kö
#  C esi-  J -in,inta   T ssä,llään  Q -ni,nsä   W -va,masi
#  D eri-  K -in,intä                N ni        X -vä,mäsi
#  E yli-                            O ni        Y -n,tte
#                                                Z -n,tte
#          ^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^^
#               These flags are automatically generated.


###########################################################################

# Prefixes:

prefixes

flag *A:
    .           >       ALI     # alivaltiosihteeri, alihankkija
    I           >       ALI\-

flag *B:
    .           >       EPÄ	# kohta -> epäkohta

flag *C:
    .           >       ESI	# liina -> esiliina

flag *D:
    .           >       ERI	# vapaus -> erivapaus


flag *E:
    .           >       YLI     # ylijohtaja
    I           >       YLI\-   # yli-inhimillinen

###########################################################################

# Suffixes:

suffixes



# Below this point the file is automatically generated by genfisuffix 0.7
# Please make changes to the genfisuffix source instead.
flag *L:
   . >	KIN
   . >	KO
   . >	KAAN
   . >	HAN
   . >	PA
   . >	KINKO
   . >	PAHAN
   . >	KOHAN
   . >	KAANKO
flag *M:
   . >	KIN
   . >	KÖ
   . >	KÄÄN
   . >	HÄN
   . >	PÄ
   . >	KINKÖ
   . >	PÄHÄN
   . >	KÖHÄN
   . >	KÄÄNKÖ
flag *N:
   A >	NI
   A >	SI
   A >	NSA
   A >	MME
   A >	NNE
   A >	NIKIN
   A >	NIKAAN
   A >	NIKO
   A >	NIPA
   A >	NIHAN
   A >	NIKINKO
   A >	NIKAANKO
   A >	NIKOHAN
   A >	NIPAHAN
   A >	SIKIN
   A >	SIKAAN
   A >	SIKO
   A >	SIPA
   A >	SIHAN
   A >	SIKINKO
   A >	SIKAANKO
   A >	SIKOHAN
   A >	SIPAHAN
   A >	NSAKIN
   A >	NSAKAAN
   A >	NSAKO
   A >	NSAPA
   A >	NSAHAN
   A >	NSAKINKO
   A >	NSAKAANKO
   A >	NSAKOHAN
   A >	NSAPAHAN
   A >	MMEKIN
   A >	MMEKAAN
   A >	MMEKO
   A >	MMEPA
   A >	MMEHAN
   A >	MMEKINKO
   A >	MMEKAANKO
   A >	MMEKOHAN
   A >	MMEPAHAN
   A >	NNEKIN
   A >	NNEKAAN
   A >	NNEKO
   A >	NNEPA
   A >	NNEHAN
   A >	NNEKINKO
   A >	NNEKAANKO
   A >	NNEKOHAN
   A >	NNEPAHAN
   [AEIOU] N >	I
   [AEIOU] N >	-N,SI
   [AEIOU] N >	SA
   [AEIOU] N >	-N,MME
   [AEIOU] N >	NE
   [AEIOU] N >	IKIN
   [AEIOU] N >	IKAAN
   [AEIOU] N >	IKO
   [AEIOU] N >	IPA
   [AEIOU] N >	IHAN
   [AEIOU] N >	IKINKO
   [AEIOU] N >	IKAANKO
   [AEIOU] N >	IKOHAN
   [AEIOU] N >	IPAHAN
   [AEIOU] N >	-N,SIKIN
   [AEIOU] N >	-N,SIKAAN
   [AEIOU] N >	-N,SIKO
   [AEIOU] N >	-N,SIPA
   [AEIOU] N >	-N,SIHAN
   [AEIOU] N >	-N,SIKINKO
   [AEIOU] N >	-N,SIKAANKO
   [AEIOU] N >	-N,SIKOHAN
   [AEIOU] N >	-N,SIPAHAN
   [AEIOU] N >	SAKIN
   [AEIOU] N >	SAKAAN
   [AEIOU] N >	SAKO
   [AEIOU] N >	SAPA
   [AEIOU] N >	SAHAN
   [AEIOU] N >	SAKINKO
   [AEIOU] N >	SAKAANKO
   [AEIOU] N >	SAKOHAN
   [AEIOU] N >	SAPAHAN
   [AEIOU] N >	-N,MMEKIN
   [AEIOU] N >	-N,MMEKAAN
   [AEIOU] N >	-N,MMEKO
   [AEIOU] N >	-N,MMEPA
   [AEIOU] N >	-N,MMEHAN
   [AEIOU] N >	-N,MMEKINKO
   [AEIOU] N >	-N,MMEKAANKO
   [AEIOU] N >	-N,MMEKOHAN
   [AEIOU] N >	-N,MMEPAHAN
   [AEIOU] N >	NEKIN
   [AEIOU] N >	NEKAAN
   [AEIOU] N >	NEKO
   [AEIOU] N >	NEPA
   [AEIOU] N >	NEHAN
   [AEIOU] N >	NEKINKO
   [AEIOU] N >	NEKAANKO
   [AEIOU] N >	NEKOHAN
   [AEIOU] N >	NEPAHAN
   [^A] A >	AN
   [^A] A >	ANKIN
   [^A] A >	ANKAAN
   [^A] A >	ANKO
   [^A] A >	ANPA
   [^A] A >	ANHAN
   [^A] A >	ANKINKO
   [^A] A >	ANKAANKO
   [^A] A >	ANKOHAN
   [^A] A >	ANPAHAN
flag *O:
   Ä >	NI
   Ä >	SI
   Ä >	NSÄ
   Ä >	MME
   Ä >	NNE
   Ä >	NIKIN
   Ä >	NIKÄÄN
   Ä >	NIKÖ
   Ä >	NIPÄ
   Ä >	NIHÄN
   Ä >	NIKINKÖ
   Ä >	NIKÄÄNKÖ
   Ä >	NIKÖHÄN
   Ä >	NIPÄHÄN
   Ä >	SIKIN
   Ä >	SIKÄÄN
   Ä >	SIKÖ
   Ä >	SIPÄ
   Ä >	SIHÄN
   Ä >	SIKINKÖ
   Ä >	SIKÄÄNKÖ
   Ä >	SIKÖHÄN
   Ä >	SIPÄHÄN
   Ä >	NSÄKIN
   Ä >	NSÄKÄÄN
   Ä >	NSÄKÖ
   Ä >	NSÄPÄ
   Ä >	NSÄHÄN
   Ä >	NSÄKINKÖ
   Ä >	NSÄKÄÄNKÖ
   Ä >	NSÄKÖHÄN
   Ä >	NSÄPÄHÄN
   Ä >	MMEKIN
   Ä >	MMEKÄÄN
   Ä >	MMEKÖ
   Ä >	MMEPÄ
   Ä >	MMEHÄN
   Ä >	MMEKINKÖ
   Ä >	MMEKÄÄNKÖ
   Ä >	MMEKÖHÄN
   Ä >	MMEPÄHÄN
   Ä >	NNEKIN
   Ä >	NNEKÄÄN
   Ä >	NNEKÖ
   Ä >	NNEPÄ
   Ä >	NNEHÄN
   Ä >	NNEKINKÖ
   Ä >	NNEKÄÄNKÖ
   Ä >	NNEKÖHÄN
   Ä >	NNEPÄHÄN
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	I
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	-N,SI
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	SÄ
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	-N,MME
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	NE
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	IKIN
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	IKÄÄN
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	IKÖ
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	IPÄ
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	IHÄN
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	IKINKÖ
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	IKÄÄNKÖ
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	IKÖHÄN
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	IPÄHÄN
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	-N,SIKIN
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	-N,SIKÄÄN
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	-N,SIKÖ
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	-N,SIPÄ
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	-N,SIHÄN
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	-N,SIKINKÖ
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	-N,SIKÄÄNKÖ
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	-N,SIKÖHÄN
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	-N,SIPÄHÄN
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	SÄKIN
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	SÄKÄÄN
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	SÄKÖ
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	SÄPÄ
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	SÄHÄN
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	SÄKINKÖ
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	SÄKÄÄNKÖ
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	SÄKÖHÄN
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	SÄPÄHÄN
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	-N,MMEKIN
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	-N,MMEKÄÄN
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	-N,MMEKÖ
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	-N,MMEPÄ
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	-N,MMEHÄN
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	-N,MMEKINKÖ
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	-N,MMEKÄÄNKÖ
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	-N,MMEKÖHÄN
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	-N,MMEPÄHÄN
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	NEKIN
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	NEKÄÄN
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	NEKÖ
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	NEPÄ
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	NEHÄN
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	NEKINKÖ
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	NEKÄÄNKÖ
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	NEKÖHÄN
   [ÄEIÖY] N >	NEPÄHÄN
   [^Ä] Ä >	ÄN
   [^Ä] Ä >	ÄNKIN
   [^Ä] Ä >	ÄNKÄÄN
   [^Ä] Ä >	ÄNKÖ
   [^Ä] Ä >	ÄNPÄ
   [^Ä] Ä >	ÄNHÄN
   [^Ä] Ä >	ÄNKINKÖ
   [^Ä] Ä >	ÄNKÄÄNKÖ
   [^Ä] Ä >	ÄNKÖHÄN
   [^Ä] Ä >	ÄNPÄHÄN
